apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="rå__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>der</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ølge__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølgende</l>   <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ølg</l>       <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølge</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølges</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølger</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølges</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ven/ne__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tep/pe__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>p</l>         <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pes</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>per</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pes</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/uge__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugd</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uget</l>        <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugd</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uget</l>        <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugde</l>        <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ugede</l>       <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugete</l>       <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>         <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugde</l>        <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ugede</l>       <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugete</l>       <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ugende</l>      <r>uge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uge</l>       <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uges</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>       <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ugd</l>       <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uget</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uger</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uges</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aug</l>       <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>       <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ugde</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uget</l>      <r>uge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anerkjenne">	 <i>anerkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="godkjenne">       <i>godkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="områ"><i>områ</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="samrå"><i>samrå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilrå"><i>tilrå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="begynne">         <i>begyn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="følge">           <i>f</i><par n="d/ølge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kjenne">          <i>kjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="erkjenne"><i>erkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forkynne"><i>forkyn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forunne"><i>forun</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forvenne"><i>forven</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frikjenne"><i>frikjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grøppe"><i>grøp</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klyppe"><i>klyp</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miskjenne"><i>miskjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miskunne"><i>miskun</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="påskjønne"><i>påskjøn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rettkjenne"><i>rettkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skamklyppe"><i>skamklyp</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjenne"><i>skjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjønne"><i>skjøn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skreppe"><i>skrep</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="snauklyppe"><i>snauklyp</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spenne"><i>spen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="suge"><i>s</i><par n="s/uge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tenne"><i>ten</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teppe"><i>tep</i><par n="tep/pe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tilkjenne"><i>tilkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="underkjenne"><i>underkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vedkjenne"><i>vedkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="venne"><i>ven</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forfølge"><i>forf</i><par n="d/ølge__vblex_adj"/></e>
